California, session 20252026, AB1250.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 99155.3 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:99155.3. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Eligible persons” means persons who receive, or who are eligible to receive, paratransit services based on a disability and whose disability cannot reasonably be expected to improve over time, as determined by the person’s qualified licensed medical professional, and whose ability to access the fixed route system cannot reasonably be expected to improve over time, as determined by the transit operator.(2) “Recertification process” means the process by which a transit operator may require persons who have previously been determined eligible for the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) complementary paratransit service to have their eligibility reviewed again.(3) “Transit operator” means a transit district, municipal operator, county transportation commission, transportation authority, joint powers authority, or other public transit operator that provides, or contracts for the provision of, paratransit service for individuals with disabilities and that receives public funding pursuant to the Mills-Alquist-Deddeh Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200)).(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, a transit operator shall establish a streamlined recertification process for eligible persons.(2) The streamlined recertification process established by a transit operator pursuant to paragraph (1) shall use a telephone interview, mail-in form, teleconference, or online survey and collect for the purposes of verification only the following information:(A) Physical address.(B) Mailing address, if different from physical address.(C) Emergency contact.(D) Telephone number.(E) Updated mobility devices.(F) Status of disability, with identification of any worsening of the person’s disability, any additional disability, any changes to the person’s functional abilities, and any changes to the person’s use of an assistive device.(G) First and last name.(H) Date of birth.(3) A transit operator may also request, as part of the streamlined recertification process, an updated photo of the eligible person if the transit operator requires a photo for its initial eligibility determination.(4) (A) A transit operator shall require eligible persons to complete the streamlined recertification process established pursuant to this subdivision once every five years.(B) An eligible person may request recertification at any time and shall complete the recertification every five years thereafter.(c) On and after June 1, 2027, a transit operator shall only use the streamlined recertification process described in subdivision (b) for eligible persons unless one of the following conditions applies:(1) There is a review to broaden the person’s eligibility for paratransit services based on either the person’s disability worsening or the person having an additional disability.(2) The person is temporarily eligible for paratransit services.(3) The transit operator has implemented service changes or improvements that may impact the person’s eligibility for paratransit services.(4) The eligible person has moved to a new physical address and the change of physical address is reasonably expected to modify their eligibility for paratransit services.(d) This section does not prohibit a transit operator from establishing and using a different recertification process for persons who do not meet the definition of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(e) This section shall not prevent a transit operator from contracting the eligibility recertification process for paratransit services, so long as the final decision regarding an eligible person’s eligibility to be recertified for paratransit services is made by the transit operator.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.